Utah statutes.
63A-5-224.   Authority to transfer land for commuter rail station and
related development.
The division may transfer title to a parcel of land it owns in a county of the
first class to a public transit district for the purpose of facilitating the
development of a commuter rail transit station and associated transit oriented
development if:
(1)  the parcel is within one mile of the proposed commuter rail transit
station and associated transit oriented development; and
(2)  the division receives in return fair and adequate consideration.
